California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
In the suit, a copy of the jeopardy determination certified by the board shall be prima facie evidence that the unlicensed person is indebted to the state in the amount of the tax, penalties, and interest computed as prescribed by Section 60339.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60365.

The foregoing remedies of the state are cumulative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60366.

No action taken pursuant to this article relieves the unlicensed person in any way from the penal provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Collection of Tax [60401. - 60496.]



  ARTICLE 1. Security for Tax [60401. - 60408.]

60401.

The board, whenever it deems it necessary to ensure compliance with this part or any rule or regulation adopted under this part, may require any person to deposit with it any security as it may determine appropriate. The amount of the security shall be fixed by the board but shall not be more than three times the estimated average monthly tax liability of the person. The total amount of security shall not be in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) where the person has established to the satisfaction of the board that this security, together with
 property to which the lien imposed by Section 60445 attaches, is sufficient security to ensure payment of taxes equivalent to three times the estimated average monthly tax liability of the person. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased by the board at any time. Any security in the form of cash or insured deposits in banks and savings and loan institutions shall be held by the board in trust to be used solely in the manner provided for in this section and Section 60406. Any security in the form of a bond or bonds shall be duly executed by an admitted surety insurer, payable to the state, conditioned upon faithful performance of all the requirements of this part, and expressly providing for the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations of the person arising out of this part. Security held by the board shall be released after a three-year period in which the person has filed all returns and paid all tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the
 state within the time required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 293.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

60402.

If any person is delinquent in the payment of any obligation imposed under this part, or in the event a determination has been made against a person that remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment becomes delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof, personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their
 possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the person, or owing any debts to the person. In the case of any state officer, department or agency, the notice shall be given to the officer, department or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60403.

After receiving the notice, the persons so notified shall not transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60404.

All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the board of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If the notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the bank at which the deposit is carried or
 at which such credits or personal property is held. Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of two times the amount, interest and penalty due from the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60405.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, he or she shall be liable to the state for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of that transfer or disposition the state is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the
 notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60406.

If, at the time a person ceases to operate under this part, the board holds a security pursuant to Section 60401 in the form of cash, or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, the security when applied to the account of the taxpayer shall be deemed to be a payment on account of any liability of the taxpayer to the board on the date the person ceases to operate under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60407.

(a) Subject to the limitations in subdivisions (b) and (c), the department may by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from those credits or other personal property the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from that person, or the amount of any liability incurred by the person under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at those times as it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the
 continuing effect of the levy, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “payment” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. “Payment” does include any of the following:

(1) Any payment due for services of an independent contractor, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Any payment or credit due or becoming due periodically as the result of an enforceable obligation to the person liable for the tax.

(3) Any other payment or credit due or becoming due the person liable as the result of a written or oral contract for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the taxpayer and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by electronic transmission or other electronic technology to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 113.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60408.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board determines receiving information from a supplier or other person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for taxes pursuant Section 60407 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating evidence furnished
 by the person liable for the tax.

(b) Upon its determination, the board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the
 determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the tax is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the board thereof.

(f) If under this section an amount that was
 withheld and not remitted to the board is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Tax [60421. - 60423.]

60421.

At any time within three years after any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected becomes due and payable and at any time within three years after the delinquency of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected, or within the period during which a lien is in force as the result of the filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board may bring an action in the courts of this state, of any other state, or of the United States in the name of the state to collect the amount delinquent together with
 penalties and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60422.

In the action a writ of attachment may be issued in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure without the showing required by Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60423.

In the action a certificate by the board showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the levy of the tax of the delinquency of the amount of tax, interest, and penalty set forth, and of compliance by the board with all provisions of this part in relation to the computation and levy of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Lien of Tax [60441. - 60445.]

60441.

Notwithstanding Section 60445, the tax, interest, and penalties are a lien upon and have the effect of an execution duly levied against any qualified motor vehicle in which diesel fuel taxable under this part is used and against any personal property of the interstate user.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60442.

The lien arising under Section 60441 attaches at the time a qualified motor vehicle is operated in this state through the use of diesel fuel taxable under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60443.

The lien arising under Section 60441 shall not be removed until the tax, interest, and penalties are paid or the qualified motor vehicle or other property subject to the lien is sold in payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60444.

The lien arising under Section 60441 as to the tax and interest, but exclusive of penalties, upon personal property is paramount to all private liens or encumbrances of whatever character, and to the rights of any conditional vendor or any other holder of the legal title, in or to any qualified motor vehicle that is operated in this state through the use of diesel fuel taxable under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60445.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed under this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. That lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following
 dates:

(1) For amounts disclosed on a return received by the board before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent.

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the board.

(3) For amounts determined under Section 60330 (pertaining to jeopardy assessments), the date the notice of the board’s finding is mailed or issued.

(4) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Warrant for Collection of Tax [60451. - 60453.]

60451.

At any time within three years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount required by this part to be paid or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall
 be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy of and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60452.

The board may pay or advance to the sheriff or marshal, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60453.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him or her by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Seizure and Sale [60461. - 60464.]

60461.

Whenever any person is delinquent in the payment of the obligations imposed under this part, the board or its authorized representative may seize any property, real or personal, subject to the lien of the tax and thereafter sell the property, or a sufficient part of it, at public auction to pay the tax due together with any interest and penalties imposed for the delinquency and any costs incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60462.

Notice of the sale and the time and place thereof shall be given in writing at least 20 days before the date set for the sale to the delinquent person and to all persons who have an interest of record in the property seized. The notice shall be personally served or enclosed in an envelope addressed to the person at his or her last known residence or place of business in this state. If not personally served, the notice shall be deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, in
 a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the property or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property or a part thereof is located. Notice shall also be posted in both of the following manners:

(a) One public place in the city in which the interest in property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest in the property is to be sold.

(b) One conspicuous place on the property.

The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the amount due, including tax, penalties, interest, and costs, the name of the person, and the further statement that unless the amount is paid on or before
 the time fixed in the notice of sale, the property, or so much of it as may be necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60462.5.

The board may seize any qualified motor vehicle subject to the lien of the tax and thereafter sell the qualified motor vehicle at private sale to pay the tax due, together with any interest and penalties imposed for the delinquency and any costs incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60462.6.

Notice of the sale shall be given in writing to the delinquent person and to all persons who have an interest of record in the qualified motor vehicle at least 10 days before the date set for the sale of the qualified motor vehicle. The notice shall be enclosed in an envelope addressed to the person at his or her last known residence or place of business and, in the case of any person who has an interest of record in the qualified motor vehicle, addressed to the person at his or her last known residence or place of business. It shall be deposited in the
 United States mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall contain a description of the qualified motor vehicle to be sold, a statement of the amount due, interest, penalties, and costs, the name of the person, and the further statement that unless the tax due, interest, penalties, and costs are paid within 10 days the qualified motor vehicle will be sold at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60463.

At any sale the board or its authorized agent shall sell the property in accordance with the law and the notice and shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the taxpayer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60464.

If upon any sale the moneys received exceed the amount due to the state from the taxpayer, the board shall return the excess to the taxpayer and obtain his or her receipt. If any person having an interest in or lien upon the property files with the board prior to the sale notice of his or her interest or lien, the board shall withhold payment of any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties to the excess moneys by a court of competent jurisdiction. If for any reason the receipt of the taxpayer is not available, the board shall
 deposit the excess moneys with the Controller, as trustee for the taxpayer, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Successor Withholding and Liability [60471. - 60474.]

60471.

If any person liable for any amount under this part sells out his or her business or stock of goods or quits the business, his or her successor or assign shall withhold from the purchase price an amount sufficient to cover that amount until the former owner produces a receipt from the board showing that it has been paid or a certificate stating that no amount is due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60472.

(a) If the purchaser of a business or stock of goods fails to withhold the purchase price as required, he or she becomes personally liable for the payment of the amount required to be withheld by him or her to the extent of the purchase price valued in money.

(b) (1) Within 60 days after the latest of the dates specified in paragraph (2), the board shall either issue the certificate or mail notice to the purchaser at his or her address as it appears
 on the records of the board of the amount that is required to be paid as a condition of issuing the certificate.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the latest of the following dates shall apply:

(A) The date the board receives a written request from the purchaser for a certificate.

(B) The date the former owner’s records are made available for audit.

(c) Failure of the board to mail the notice referred to in subdivision (b) shall release the purchaser from any further obligation to withhold from the purchase price under this article. The last day upon which the obligation of the successor may be enforced shall be no later than three years after the date the board is notified of the purchase of the business or stock of goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 13.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60473.

The certificate may be issued after the payment of all amounts due under this part, according to the records of the board as of the date of the certificate, or after the payment of the amounts is secured to the satisfaction of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60474.

The obligation of the successor shall be enforced by serving a notice of successor liability on the person. The notice shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of a notice of a deficiency determination, not later than three years after the date the board is notified of the purchase of the business or stock of goods. The successor may petition for reconsideration in the manner provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 60350) of Chapter 6. The notice shall become final and the amount due and payable in the manner provided in that article except
 that no additional penalty shall apply if not paid when due and payable. This chapter, with respect to the collection of any amount required to be paid under this part, shall apply when the notice becomes final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Miscellaneous Provisions [60491. - 60496.]

60491.

The remedies of the state provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the board constitutes an election by the state to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60492.

The board shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the board a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60493.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any taxes due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the board and the taxpayer may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the board, the board may terminate the agreement by
 mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of his or her right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the tax, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The board shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of taxes, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy. 

(e) Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within 45 days from the date on which the board’s notice of determination or redetermination becomes final, and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the board shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 60355.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60493.5.

The board, beginning no later than January 1, 2001, shall provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 60493 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year, and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60495.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of tax, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount less than or equal to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other tax imposed by this part.

(d) (1) If the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee shall file with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a) shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other tax imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 149.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60496.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may provide
 service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section shall
 apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 39.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Overpayment and Refunds [60501. - 60581.]



  ARTICLE 1. Refunds on Certain Sales and Uses [60501. - 60512.]

60501.

Persons who have paid a tax for diesel fuel lost, sold, or removed as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or used in a nontaxable use, other than on a farm for farming purposes or in an exempt bus operation, shall, except as otherwise provided in this part, be reimbursed and repaid the amount of the tax.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in
 subdivision (b), a claim for refund with respect to diesel fuel is allowed under this section only if all of the following apply:

(1) Tax was imposed on the diesel fuel to which the claim relates.

(2) The claimant bought or produced the diesel fuel and did not sell or resell it in this state except as provided in paragraph (4).

(3) The claimant has filed a timely claim for refund that contains the information required under subdivision (b) and the claim is supported by the original invoice or original invoice facsimile retained in an alternative storage media showing the purchase. If no original invoice was created, electronic invoicing shall be accepted as reflected by a computerized facsimile when accompanied by an original copy of the bill of lading or fuel manifest that can be directly tied to the electronic
 invoice.

(4) The diesel fuel was any of the following:

(A) Used for purposes other than operating motor vehicles upon the public highways of the state.

(B) Exported for use outside of this state. Diesel fuel carried from this state in the fuel tank of a motor vehicle is not deemed to be exported from this state unless the diesel fuel becomes subject to tax as an import under the laws of the destination state.

(C) Used in any construction equipment that is exempt from vehicle registration pursuant to the Vehicle Code, while operated within the confines and limits of a construction project.

(D) Used in the operation of a motor vehicle on any highway that is under the jurisdiction of the
 United States Department of Agriculture and with respect to the use of the highway the claimant pays, or contributes to, the cost of construction or maintenance thereof pursuant to an agreement with, or permission of, the United States Department of Agriculture.

(E) Used in any motor vehicle owned by any county, city and county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public agency when operated by it over any highway constructed and maintained by the United States or any department or agency thereof within a military reservation in this state. If the motor vehicle is operated both over the highway and over a public highway outside the military reservation in a continuous trip the tax shall not be refunded as to that portion of the diesel fuel used to operate the vehicle over the public highway outside the military reservation.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as a refund
 of the tax for the use of diesel fuel in any motor vehicle operated upon a public highway within a military reservation, which highway is constructed or maintained by this state or any political subdivision thereof.

As used in this section, “military reservation” includes any establishment of the United States Government or any agency thereof used by the Armed Forces of the United States for military, air, or naval operations, including research projects.

(F) Sold by a supplier and which was sold to any consulate officer or consulate employee under circumstances which would have entitled the supplier to an exemption under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100 if the supplier had sold the diesel fuel directly to the consulate officer or consulate employee.

(G) Lost in the ordinary course of handling, transportation, or
 storage.

(H) (i) Sold by a person to the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities under circumstances that would have entitled that person to an exemption from the payment of diesel fuel tax under Section 60100 had that person been the supplier of this diesel fuel.

(ii) Sold by a supplier and which was sold by credit card to the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities under circumstances which would have entitled the supplier to an exemption under Section 60100 if the supplier had sold the diesel fuel directly to the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities.

(I) Sold by a person to a train operator for use in a diesel-powered train or for other off-highway use under circumstances that would have entitled that person to an exemption from the payment of diesel
 fuel tax under Section 60100 had that person been the supplier of this diesel fuel.

(J) Removed from an approved terminal at the terminal rack, but only to the extent that the supplier can show that the tax on the same amount of diesel fuel has been paid more than one time by the same supplier.
